Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.901

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2024 c 188 s 15.]